Tennessee, session 114, HB0700.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 62-13-303, is amended by deleting
subsection (h) and substituting:
(h)
(1) Within a period of three (3) years from the date of issuance of an
original broker's license, the licensee shall, as a requisite for the reissuance of
the license, furnish certification of satisfactory completion of an additional one
hundred twenty (120) classroom hours in real estate at any school, college, or
university approved by the commission.
(2) Beginning with the license period immediately following the license
period in which the licensee completes the one hundred twenty (120) hours of
education specified in subdivision (h)(1), and except as provided in subdivision
(h)(3), every two (2) years, a broker's licensee shall furnish certification of
satisfactory completion of sixteen (16) classroom hours in real estate courses at
any school, college, or university approved by the commission as a requisite for
the reissuance of the license.
(3) A broker licensee who was originally licensed prior to January 1,
2005, and does not supervise any affiliate brokers is exempt from the
requirement in subdivision (h)(2).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0700
002857
- 1 -